Illinois, session 104th, SB2296.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-13 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/1-13)7    Sec. 1-13. Applicability to public institutions of higher 8education.9    (a) This Code shall not apply to public institutions of 10higher education, regardless of the source of the funds with 11which contracts are paid, except as provided in this Section.12    (b) (Blank). Except as provided in this Section, this Code 13shall not apply to procurements made by or on behalf of public 14institutions of higher education for any of the following:15        (1) Memberships in professional, academic, research, 16    or athletic organizations on behalf of a public 17    institution of higher education, an employee of a public 18    institution of higher education, or a student at a public 19    institution of higher education.20        (2) Procurement expenditures for events or activities 21    paid for exclusively by revenues generated by the event or 22    activity, gifts or donations for the event or activity, 23    private grants, or any combination thereof.  SB2296- 2 -LRB104 10181 HLH 20253 b1        (3) Procurement expenditures for events or activities 2    for which the use of specific potential contractors is 3    mandated or identified by the sponsor of the event or 4    activity, provided that the sponsor is providing a 5    majority of the funding for the event or activity.6        (4) Procurement expenditures necessary to provide 7    athletic, artistic or musical services, performances, 8    events, or productions by or for a public institution of 9    higher education.10        (5) Procurement expenditures for periodicals, books, 11    subscriptions, database licenses, and other publications 12    procured for use by a university library or academic 13    department, except for expenditures related to procuring 14    textbooks for student use or materials for resale or 15    rental.16        (6) Procurement expenditures for placement of students 17    in externships, practicums, field experiences, and for 18    medical residencies and rotations. 19        (7) Contracts for programming and broadcast license 20    rights for university-operated radio and television 21    stations. 22        (8) Procurement expenditures necessary to perform 23    sponsored research and other sponsored activities under 24    grants and contracts funded by the sponsor or by sources 25    other than State appropriations.26        (9) Contracts with a foreign entity for research or   SB2296- 3 -LRB104 10181 HLH 20253 b1    educational activities, provided that the foreign entity 2    either does not maintain an office in the United States or 3    is the sole source of the service or product. 4        (10) Procurement expenditures for any ongoing software 5    license or maintenance agreement or competitively 6    solicited software purchase, when the software, license, 7    or maintenance agreement is available through only the 8    software creator or its manufacturer and not a reseller. 9        (11) Procurement expenditures incurred outside of the 10    United States for the recruitment of international 11    students. 12        (12) Procurement expenditures for contracts entered 13    into under the Public University Energy Conservation Act. 14        (13) Procurement expenditures for advertising 15    purchased directly from a media station or the owner of 16    the station for distribution of advertising. 17Notice of each contract with an annual value of more than 18$100,000 entered into by a public institution of higher 19education that is related to the procurement of goods and 20services identified in items (1) through (13) of this 21subsection shall be published in the Procurement Bulletin 22within 14 calendar days after contract execution. The Chief 23Procurement Officer shall prescribe the form and content of 24the notice. Each public institution of higher education shall 25provide the Chief Procurement Officer, on a monthly basis, in 26the form and content prescribed by the Chief Procurement   SB2296- 4 -LRB104 10181 HLH 20253 b1Officer, a report of contracts that are related to the 2procurement of goods and services identified in this 3subsection. At a minimum, this report shall include the name 4of the contractor, a description of the supply or service 5provided, the total amount of the contract, the term of the 6contract, and the exception to the Code utilized. A copy of any 7or all of these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 8Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 9Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor and 10General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year that 11shall include, at a minimum, an annual summary of the monthly 12information reported to the Chief Procurement Officer.13    (b-5) (Blank). Except as provided in this subsection, the 14provisions of this Code shall not apply to contracts for 15medical supplies or to contracts for medical services 16necessary for the delivery of care and treatment at medical, 17dental, pharmaceutical, or veterinary teaching facilities used 18by Southern Illinois University or the University of Illinois 19or at any university-operated health care center or dispensary 20that provides care, treatment, and medications for students, 21faculty, and staff. Furthermore, the provisions of this Code 22do not apply to the procurement by such a facility of any 23additional supplies or services that the operator of the 24facility deems necessary for the effective use and functioning 25of the medical supplies or services that are otherwise exempt 26from this Code under this subsection (b-5), including, but not   SB2296- 5 -LRB104 10181 HLH 20253 b1limited to, procurements necessary for compliance and 2management of federal programs. However, other supplies and 3services needed for these teaching facilities shall be subject 4to the jurisdiction of the Chief Procurement Officer for 5Public Institutions of Higher Education who may establish 6expedited procurement procedures and may waive or modify 7certification, contract, hearing, process and registration 8requirements required by this Code. All procurements made 9under this subsection shall be documented and may require 10publication in the Illinois Procurement Bulletin. 11    (b-10) (Blank). Procurements made by or on behalf of the 12University of Illinois for investment services may be entered 13into or renewed without being subject to the requirements of 14this Code. Notice of intent to renew a contract shall be 15published in the Illinois Public Higher Education Procurement 16Bulletin at least 14 days prior to the execution of a renewal, 17and the University of Illinois shall hold a public hearing for 18interested parties to provide public comment. Any contract 19extended, renewed, or entered pursuant to this exception shall 20be published in the Illinois Public Higher Education 21Procurement Bulletin within 5 days of contract execution. 22    (c) (Blank). Procurements made by or on behalf of public 23institutions of higher education for the fulfillment of a 24grant shall be made in accordance with the requirements of 25this Code to the extent practical.26    Upon the written request of a public institution of higher   SB2296- 6 -LRB104 10181 HLH 20253 b1education, the Chief Procurement Officer may waive contract, 2registration, certification, and hearing requirements of this 3Code if, based on the item to be procured or the terms of a 4grant, compliance is impractical. The public institution of 5higher education shall provide the Chief Procurement Officer 6with specific reasons for the waiver, including the necessity 7of contracting with a particular potential contractor, and 8shall certify that an effort was made in good faith to comply 9with the provisions of this Code. The Chief Procurement 10Officer shall provide written justification for any waivers. 11By November 1 of each year, the Chief Procurement Officer 12shall file a report with the General Assembly identifying each 13contract approved with waivers and providing the justification 14given for any waivers for each of those contracts. Notice of 15each waiver made under this subsection shall be published in 16the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar days after 17contract execution. The Chief Procurement Officer shall 18prescribe the form and content of the notice.19    (d) (Blank). Notwithstanding this Section, a waiver of the 20registration requirements of Section 20-160 does not permit a 21business entity and any affiliated entities or affiliated 22persons to make campaign contributions if otherwise prohibited 23by Section 50-37. The total amount of contracts awarded in 24accordance with this Section shall be included in determining 25the aggregate amount of contracts or pending bids of a 26business entity and any affiliated entities or affiliated   SB2296- 7 -LRB104 10181 HLH 20253 b1persons.2    (e) (Blank). Notwithstanding subsection (e) of Section 350-10.5 of this Code, the Chief Procurement Officer, with the 4approval of the Executive Ethics Commission, may permit a 5public institution of higher education to accept a bid or 6enter into a contract with a business that assisted the public 7institution of higher education in determining whether there 8is a need for a contract or assisted in reviewing, drafting, or 9preparing documents related to a bid or contract, provided 10that the bid or contract is essential to research administered 11by the public institution of higher education and it is in the 12best interest of the public institution of higher education to 13accept the bid or contract. For purposes of this subsection, 14"business" includes all individuals with whom a business is 15affiliated, including, but not limited to, any officer, agent, 16employee, consultant, independent contractor, director, 17partner, manager, or shareholder of a business. The Executive 18Ethics Commission may promulgate rules and regulations for the 19implementation and administration of the provisions of this 20subsection (e).21    (f) As used in this Section:22    "Grant" means non-appropriated funding provided by a 23federal or private entity to support a project or program 24administered by a public institution of higher education and 25any non-appropriated funding provided to a sub-recipient of 26the grant.  SB2296- 8 -LRB104 10181 HLH 20253 b1    "Public institution of higher education" means Chicago 2State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 3University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 4University, Northern Illinois University, Southern Illinois 5University, University of Illinois, Western Illinois 6University, and, for purposes of this Code only, the Illinois 7Mathematics and Science Academy.8    (g) (Blank).9    (h) The General Assembly finds and declares that: 10        (1) Public Act 98-1076, which took effect on January 11    1, 2015, changed the repeal date set for this Section from 12    December 31, 2014 to December 31, 2016. 13        (2) The Statute on Statutes sets forth general rules 14    on the repeal of statutes and the construction of multiple 15    amendments, but Section 1 of that Act also states that 16    these rules will not be observed when the result would be 17    "inconsistent with the manifest intent of the General 18    Assembly or repugnant to the context of the statute". 19        (3) This amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly 20    manifests the intention of the General Assembly to remove 21    the repeal of this Section. 22        (4) This Section was originally enacted to protect, 23    promote, and preserve the general welfare. Any 24    construction of this Section that results in the repeal of 25    this Section on December 31, 2014 would be inconsistent 26    with the manifest intent of the General Assembly and   SB2296- 9 -LRB104 10181 HLH 20253 b1    repugnant to the context of this Code. 2    It is hereby declared to have been the intent of the 3General Assembly that this Section not be subject to repeal on 4December 31, 2014. 5    This Section shall be deemed to have been in continuous 6effect since December 20, 2011 (the effective date of Public 7Act 97-643), and it shall continue to be in effect 8henceforward until it is otherwise lawfully repealed. All 9previously enacted amendments to this Section taking effect on 10or after December 31, 2014, are hereby validated. 11    All actions taken in reliance on or pursuant to this 12Section by any public institution of higher education, person, 13or entity are hereby validated. 14    In order to ensure the continuing effectiveness of this 15Section, it is set forth in full and re-enacted by this 16amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly. This 17re-enactment is intended as a continuation of this Section. It 18is not intended to supersede any amendment to this Section 19that is enacted by the 100th General Assembly. 20    In this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, the 21base text of the reenacted Section is set forth as amended by 22Public Act 98-1076. Striking and underscoring is used only to 23show changes being made to the base text. 24    This Section applies to all procurements made on or before 25the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 26Assembly.   SB2296- 10 -LRB104 10181 HLH 20253 b1(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-721, eff. 5-6-22; 2102-1119, eff. 1-23-23; 103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-865, eff. 31-1-25.)